Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB244.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 22-2809b is hereby amended to read as
follows: 22-2809b. (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Compensated surety" means any person who or entity that is
organized under the laws of the state of Kansas that, as surety, issues
appearance bonds for compensation, posts bail for four or more persons in
a calendar year, is responsible for any forfeiture and is liable for
appearance bonds written by such person's or entity's authorized agents. A
"compensated surety" is either an insurance agent surety, a property surety
or a bail agent.
(2) "Insurance agent surety" means a compensated surety licensed by
the insurance commissioner to issue surety bonds or appearance bonds in
this state and who represents an authorized insurance company. An
"insurance agent surety" may have other insurance agent sureties working
with or for such surety.
(3) "Property surety" means a compensated surety who secures
appearance bonds by property pledged as security. A "property surety"
may be a person or entity and may authorize bail agents to act on behalf of
the "property surety" in writing appearance bonds.
(4) "Bail agent" means a person authorized by a compensated surety
to execute surety bail bonds on such surety's behalf.
(5) "Appearance bond premium" means the fee charged by a
compensated surety for posting an appearance bond.
(b) Every compensated surety shall submit an application to the chief
judge of the judicial district, or the chief judge's designee, in each judicial
district where such surety seeks to act as a surety. A compensated surety
shall not act as a surety in such judicial district prior to approval of such
application.
(1) The application shall include, but is not limited to, the following
information for each insurance agent surety, property surety or bail agent:

SB 244—Am. by SCW 2
(A) A copy of the applicant's Kansas driver's license or nondriver's
identification card;
(B) a statement, made under penalty of perjury, that the applicant is a
resident of this state and is not prohibited by K.S.A. 22-2809a(c), and
amendments thereto, from acting as a surety; and
(C) a certificate of continuing education compliance in accordance
with subsection (g).
(2) The application for each insurance agent surety also shall include:
(A) A copy of the qualifying power of attorney certificates issued to
such surety by any insurance company;
(B) a current and valid certificate of license from the insurance
department; and
(C) a current and valid certificate of authority from the insurance
department.
(3) The application for each property surety also shall include:
(A) A list of all bail agents authorized by such property surety to
write appearance bonds on such property surety's behalf and all
documentation from such bail agents demonstrating compliance with
subsection (b)(1); and
(B) an affidavit describing the property by which such property surety
proposes to justify its obligations and the encumbrances thereon, and all
such surety's other liabilities. The description shall include a valuation of
the property described therein. If the valuation is not readily evident, an
appraisal of the property may be required and, if required, shall be
incorporated into the affidavit.
(4) The chief judge of the judicial district may require, as a
qualification for initial or continued authorization in the judicial district, a
compensated surety to submit to a state and national criminal history
record check. The fingerprints shall be used to identify the individual and
to determine whether the individual has a record of criminal history in this
state or any other jurisdiction. The chief judge or the chief judge's designee
is authorized to submit the fingerprints to the Kansas bureau of
investigation and the federal bureau of investigation for a state and
national criminal history record check. The chief judge or the chief judge's
designee may use the information obtained from fingerprinting and the
criminal history record check for purposes of verifying the identification
of the individual and for making an official determination of the
qualifications for authorization in the judicial district. Disclosure or use of
any information received by the chief judge or the chief judge's designee
for any purpose other than the purposes provided for in this paragraph
shall be a class A nonperson misdemeanor. The Kansas bureau of
investigation may charge a reasonable fee for conducting a criminal
history record check, and the individual seeking initial or continued

SB 244—Am. by SCW 3
authorization under this section shall pay the costs of fingerprinting and
the state and national criminal history record check.
(c) A property surety authorized to act as a surety in a judicial district
pursuant to subsection (b) shall be allowed outstanding appearance bonds
in the state of Kansas not to exceed an aggregate amount that is 15 times
the valuation of the property described in subsection (b)(3). Such property
surety shall not write any single appearance bond that exceeds 35% of the
total valuation of the property described in subsection (b)(3).
(d) (1) A compensated surety shall:
(A) Charge a minimum appearance bond premium of 10% of the face
amount of the appearance bond;
(B) only post a bond after the compensated surety has received at
least 1/ of the required minimum appearance bond premium in one of the

following forms:
(i) Currency of the United States paid to the compensated surety prior
to the execution of an appearance bond;
(ii) a check delivered to a compensated surety that shall be properly
payable when delivered and promptly deposited in the compensated
surety's bank account;
(iii) a credit or debit card transaction if the compensated surety
obtains authorization from the card issuer for the amount due and an
approval number from the card issuer; or
(iv) a bank or wire transfer or other electronic funds transfer
including, but not limited to, peer-to-peer transfer, if such transfer occurs
prior to the execution of the appearance bond; and
(C) be physically present when the bond is posted and sign the bond
at the jail.
(2) A compensated surety shall enter into a premium financing
agreement for any unpaid minimum appearance bond premium amount. A
compensated surety shall not provide a loan for the portion of the
minimum appearance bond premium required by subsection (d)(1)(B). Any
loan obtained for the purpose of paying the portion of a minimum
appearance bond premium required by subsection (d)(1)(B) shall be
obtained from a financial institution that is properly licensed in the state
of Kansas. A compensated surety shall not be an owner, in whole or in
part, or in any way affiliated with any financial institution making loans
for the portion of the minimum appearance bond premium required by
subsection (d)(1)(B).
(e) (1) Each judicial district may, by local rule, require additional
information from any compensated surety and establish what property is
acceptable for bonding purposes under subsection (b)(3).
(2) A judicial district shall not require any compensated surety to
apply for authorization in such judicial district more than once per year,

SB 244—Am. by SCW 4
but may require additional reporting from any compensated surety in its
discretion. If the judicial district does not require an annual application,
each compensated surety or bail agent shall provide a certificate of
continuing education compliance in accordance with subsection (g) to the
judicial district each year.
(3) A judicial district shall not decline authorization for a
compensated surety solely on the basis of type of compensated surety.
(f) (1) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the chief
judge of the judicial district, or the chief judge's designee, to authorize any
compensated surety to act as a surety in such judicial district if the judge
or designee finds, in such person's discretion, that such authorization is not
warranted.
(2) (A) If such authorization is granted, the chief judge of the judicial
district, or the chief judge's designee, may terminate or suspend the
authorization at any time. Reasons for terminating or suspending such
authorization include, but are not limited to:
(i) Filing false statements with the court;
(ii) failing to charge the minimum appearance bond premium as
required by this section;
(iii) paying a fee or rebate or giving or promising anything of value to
a jailer, law enforcement officer, any person who has the power to arrest or
hold a person in custody or any public official or employee in order to
secure a settlement, compromise, remission or reduction of the amount of
any appearance bond, forfeiture or estreatment, or to secure or delay an
appearance bond;
(iv) paying a fee or rebate or giving or promising anything of value,
other than reward payments for information relating to the apprehension of
fugitives, to an inmate in exchange for a business referral;
(v) requiring or accepting anything of value from a principal other
than the appearance bond premium, except that the compensated surety
may accept collateral security or other indemnity to secure the face amount
of the bond;
(vi) intentionally failing to promptly return collateral security to the
principal when the principal is entitled to return of such security;
(vii) knowingly employing or otherwise compensating for any
appearance bond related work, any person who has been convicted of a
felony unless such conviction has been expunged, other than reward
payments for information relating to the apprehension of fugitives; or
(viii) failing to pay any forfeiture judgment within 30 days of the
filing of the journal entry of judgment.
(B) The judge or the judge's desginee may investigate claims of
violations described in subparagraph (A). If the chief judge makes a
finding that a violation has occurred, the chief judge may suspend or

SB 244—Am. by SCW 5
terminate the authorization of the compensated surety.
(C) If the authorization is suspended for 30 days or more, the chief
judge shall make a record describing the length of the suspension and the
underlying cause and provide such record to the surety. Such surety, upon
request, shall be entitled to a hearing within 30 days after the suspension is
ordered.
(D) If the authorization is terminated, the chief judge shall make a
record describing the underlying cause and provide such record to the
surety. Such surety, upon request, shall be entitled to a hearing within 30
days after the termination is ordered.
(3) If an authorized compensated surety does not comply with the
continuing education requirements in subsection (g), the chief judge of the
judicial district, or the chief judge's designee, may allow a conditional
authorization to continue acting as a surety for 90 days. If such
compensated surety does not comply with the continuing education
requirements in subsection (g) within 90 days, such conditional
authorization shall be terminated and such compensated surety shall not
act as a surety in such judicial district.
(g) (1) Every compensated surety shall obtain at least eight hours of
continuing education credits during each 12-month period.
(2) The Kansas bail agents association shall either provide or contract
for a minimum of eight hours of continuing education classes to be held at
least once annually in each congressional district and may provide
additional classes in its discretion. The chief judge in each judicial district
may provide a list of topics to be covered during the continuing education
classes. A schedule of such classes shall be publicly available. The
association shall not charge more than $300 annually for the eight hours of
continuing education classes, and the cost of any class with less than eight
hours of continuing education may be prorated accordingly. Any fee
charged for attending continuing education classes shall not be increased
or decreased based upon a compensated surety's membership or lack of
membership in the association.
(3) Upon completion of at least eight hours of continuing education
credits during each 12-month period by a compensated surety, the Kansas
bail agents association shall issue a certificate of continuing education
compliance to such surety. The certificate shall be prepared and delivered
to the compensated surety within 30 days of such surety's completion of
the continuing education requirements. The certificate shall show in detail
the dates and hours of each course attended, along with the signature of the
Kansas bail agents association official attesting that all continuing
education requirements have been completed.
(4) Any continuing education credits used to comply with conditional
authorization pursuant to subsection (f)(3) shall not be applied towards

SB 244—Am. by SCW 6
compliance in the current 12-month period or any subsequent 12-month
period.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 22-2809b is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.